Connecticut, session 2026, HB05264.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No insurer that delivers,
issues for delivery, renews, amends or endorses a homeowners or
tenants insurance policy in this state on or after October 1, 2026, shall
cancel, refuse to renew or refuse to issue such policy solely on the basis
of the breed of dog owned by the insured or the applicant, with respect
to any dog that is a dog trained or being trained as a service animal to
assist blind, deaf or mobility impaired persons. As used in this section,
"service animal" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-345 of
the general statutes.
Sec. 2. Section 54-86n of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section, "companion animal" means a
domesticated dog, cat, horse, rabbit, ferret, bird, rodent, fish, reptile,
amphibian or other species of animal kept for pleasure rather than
utility and that is normally kept in or near the household of its owner or
keeper and is dependent on a person for food, shelter and veterinary
LCO 1 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 5264
care, but does not include a dog, cat, horse, rabbit, ferret, bird, rodent,
fish, reptile, amphibian or other species of animal kept for farming or
biomedical research practices.
[(a)] (b) In any prosecution under section 53-247, as amended by this
act, or in any court proceeding pursuant to section 22-329a or in the
criminal session of the Superior Court regarding the welfare or custody
of a [cat or dog] companion animal, the court may order, upon its own
initiative or upon request of a party or counsel for a party, that a
separate advocate be appointed to represent the interests of justice. If a
court orders that an advocate be appointed to represent the interests of
justice, the court shall appoint such advocate from a list provided to the
court by the Commissioner of Agriculture pursuant to subsection [(c)]
(d) of this section. A decision by the court denying a request to appoint
a separate advocate to represent the interests of justice shall not be
subject to appeal.
[(b)] (c) The advocate may: (1) Monitor the case; (2) consult any
individual with information that could aid the judge or fact finder and
review records relating to the condition of the [cat or dog] companion
animal and the defendant's actions, including, but not limited to,
records from animal control officers, veterinarians and police officers;
(3) attend hearings; and (4) present information or recommendations to
the court pertinent to determinations that relate to the interests of
justice, provided such information and recommendations shall be based
solely upon the duties undertaken pursuant to this subsection.
[(c)] (d) The Department of Agriculture shall maintain a list of
attorneys with knowledge of animal issues and the legal system and a
list of law schools that have students, or anticipate having students, with
an interest in animal issues and the legal system. Such attorneys and law
students shall be eligible to serve on a voluntary basis as advocates
under this section. The provisions of sections 3-14 to 3-21, inclusive, of
the Connecticut Practice Book shall govern a law student's participation
as an advocate under this section.
LCO 2 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 5264
Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 53-247 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) Any person who overdrives, drives when overloaded, overworks,
tortures, deprives of necessary sustenance, mutilates or cruelly beats or
kills or unjustifiably injures any animal, or who, having impounded or
confined any animal, fails to give such animal proper care or neglects to
cage or restrain any such animal from doing injury to itself or to another
animal or fails to supply any such animal with wholesome air, food and
water, or unjustifiably administers any poisonous or noxious drug or
substance to any domestic animal or unjustifiably exposes any such
drug or substance, with intent that the same shall be taken by an animal,
or causes it to be done, or, having charge or custody of any animal,
inflicts cruelty upon it or fails to provide it with proper food, drink or
protection from the weather or abandons it or carries it or causes it to be
carried in a cruel manner, or fights with or baits, harasses or worries any
animal for the purpose of making it perform for amusement, diversion
or exhibition, shall [, for a first offense, be fined not more than one
thousand dollars or imprisoned not more than one year or both, and for
each subsequent offense, shall] be guilty of a class D felony.
Sec. 4. Section 53a-61 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of assault in the third degree when: (1) With
intent to cause physical injury to another person or a domestic animal,
he causes such injury to such person, [or] to a third person or to a
domestic animal; or (2) he recklessly causes serious physical injury to
another person or a domestic animal; or (3) with criminal negligence, he
causes physical injury to another person or a domestic animal by means
of a deadly weapon, a dangerous instrument or an electronic defense
weapon.
(b) Assault in the third degree is a class A misdemeanor and any
person found guilty under subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this
LCO 3 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 5264
section shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of one year which
may not be suspended or reduced.
Sec. 5. Section 53a-61a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of assault of an elderly, blind, disabled or
pregnant person, [or] a person with intellectual disability or a domestic
animal in the third degree when such person commits assault in the
third degree under section 53a-61, as amended by this act, and (1) the
victim of such assault has attained at least sixty years of age, is blind or
physically disabled, as defined in section 1-1f, or is pregnant, [or] (2) the
victim of such assault is a person with intellectual disability, as defined
in section 1-1g, and the actor is not a person with intellectual disability,
or (3) the victim of such assault is a domestic animal.
(b) No person shall be found guilty of assault in the third degree and
assault of an elderly, blind, disabled or pregnant person, [or] a person
with intellectual disability or a domestic animal in the third degree upon
the same incident of assault but such person may be charged and
prosecuted for both such offenses upon the same information.
(c) In any prosecution for an offense under this section based on the
100 victim being pregnant it shall be an affirmative defense that the actor, at
101 the time such actor engaged in the conduct constituting the offense, did
102 not know the victim was pregnant. In any prosecution for an offense
103 under this section based on the victim being a person with intellectual
104 disability, it shall be an affirmative defense that the actor, at the time
105 such actor engaged in the conduct constituting the offense, did not
106 know the victim was a person with intellectual disability.
107 (d) Assault of an elderly, blind, disabled or pregnant person, [or] a
108 person with intellectual disability or a domestic animal in the third
109 degree is a class A misdemeanor and any person found guilty under this
110 section shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of one year which
111 shall not be suspended or reduced.
LCO 4 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 5264
112 Sec. 6. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established a task force to
113 (1) study the establishment of a state animal abuse registry, (2)
114 recommend revisions to the accelerated pretrial rehabilitation program
115 established under section 54-56e of the general statutes concerning (A)
116 restricting participation in such program by any person charged with,
117 or that is a repeat offender of, an animal cruelty offense identified in
118 section 53-247 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, and (B)
119 ways to improve such program, and (3) recommend revisions to statutes
120 concerning animal cruelty or neglect. Such study shall include, but need
121 not be limited to, an examination of the following: (A) The information
122 that should be collected for such registry and how often such
123 information should be updated, (B) how such registry would be
124 accessed by the public, (C) the content of the accelerated pretrial
125 rehabilitation program and any recommendations for improvements to
126 such program, and (D) laws in the state relating to animal cruelty or
127 neglect.
128 (b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
129 (1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
130 (2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
131 (3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
132 Representatives;
133 (4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
134 (5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
135 Representatives;
136 (6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
137 (7) Two appointed by the chairpersons of the joint standing
138 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
139 relating to insurance, who are mental health professionals who have
140 experience in the provision of care to individuals who have experienced
141 trauma;
LCO 5 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 5264
142 (8) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
143 or the commissioner's designee;
144 (9) The Chief State's Attorney, or the Chief State's Attorney's
145 designee;
146 (10) The Chief Public Defender, or the Chief Public Defender's
147 designee; and
148 (11) The Chief Court Administrator, or the Chief Court
149 Administrator's designee.
150 (c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
151 (2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
152 of the General Assembly.
153 (d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
154 than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
155 be filled by the appointing authority.
156 (e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
157 tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
158 among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
159 the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
160 days after the effective date of this section.
161 (f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
162 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to insurance
163 shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
164 (g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
165 on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committees
166 of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
167 insurance and the judiciary, in accordance with the provisions of section
168 11-4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date
169 that it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
LCO 6 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 5264
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 54-86n
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 53-247(a)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 53a-61
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 53a-61a
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed.
INS Joint Favorable Subst. C/R JUD
LCO 7 of 7